Nevada, session 83, AB562.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $27,004,162
for the HAVA Election Reform budget account for the costs of the
continued replacement of the voter registration and elections
management system.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $748,800 for
the HAVA Election Reform budget account for the costs of
consulting services to support the continued implementation of the
voter registration and elections management system.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $3,487,364
for the HAVA Election Reform budget account for the costs of
connectivity of automatic voter registration agencies.
Sec. 4. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made
or any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the fund from which
it was appropriated on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)